hr-HR: Značajke stabilnosti stalka za specijalne efekte: Nogice protiv klizanja; Uključen protuuteg; Nogice za niveliranje; Nogice sa zaključavanjem; Gumene nogice; Točka za sigurnosno vezivanje; Kuka za vreću s pijeskom; Nogice sa šiljcima; Potporni stabilizator; Široka baza; Ostalo
es: Características de estabilidad del soporte de efectos especiales: Patas antideslizantes; Contrapeso incluido; Patas niveladoras; Patas con bloqueo; Patas de goma; Punto de amarre de seguridad; Gancho para saco de arena; Patas con clavos; Tirante separador; Base ancha; Otro
sv: Stabilitetsfunktioner för specialeffektstativet: Halkfria fötter; Motvikt ingår; Ställfötter; Låsbara ben; Gummifötter; Fästpunkt för säkerhetslina; Krok för sandsäck; Spikfötter; Mellanstag; Bred bas; Annat
pt-BR: Suporte para efeitos especiais recursos de estabilidade: Pés antiderrapantes; Contrapeso incluído; Pés niveladores; Pernas com trava; Pés de borracha; Ponto de fixação de segurança; Gancho para saco de areia; Pés com cravos; Cruzeta estabilizadora; Base larga; Outros
vi: Đặc điểm ổn định của giá đỡ hiệu ứng đặc biệt: Chân chống trượt; Kèm theo đối trọng; Chân cân bằng; Chân khóa; Chân cao su; Điểm buộc dây an toàn; Móc treo bao cát; Chân đinh; Thanh giằng chéo; Đế rộng; Khác
da: Stabilitetsfunktioner for special effects-stativ: Skridsikre fødder; Modvægt medfølger; Nivelleringsfødder; Låseben; Gummifødder; Sikkerhedsfastgørelsespunkt; Sandsækkrog; Pigfødder; Tværstiver; Bred base; Andet
ru: Особенности устойчивости стойки для спецэффектов: Противоскользящие ножки; Противовес в комплекте; Регулируемые ножки; Ножки с фиксацией; Резиновые ножки; Точка крепления страховочного троса; Крюк для мешка с песком; Ножки с шипами; Распорка; Широкое основание; Другое
it: Caratteristiche di stabilità del supporto per effetti speciali: Piedini antiscivolo; Contrappeso incluso; Piedini livellanti; Gambe bloccabili; Piedini in gomma; Punto di ancoraggio di sicurezza; Gancio per sacco di sabbia; Piedini a punta; Rinforzo stabilizzatore; Base larga; Altro
sl-SI: Stabilnostne lastnosti stojala za posebne učinke: Protizdrsne nogice; Priložena protiutež; Nastavljive nogice; Noge z zaklepom; Gumijaste nogice; Varnostna pritrdilna točka; Kavelj za vrečo s peskom; Nogice s konicami; Povezovalna prečka; Široko podnožje; Drugo
ja: 特殊効果スタンド安定性機能: 滑り止め付き脚; カウンターウェイト付属; レベリングフット; ロック付き脚; ゴム脚; 安全テザーポイント; サンドバッグフック; スパイク脚; スプレッダーブレース; ワイドベース; その他
en: Special effects stand stability features: Anti-slip feet; Counterweight included; Leveling feet; Locking legs; Rubber feet; Safety tether point; Sandbag hook; Spiked feet; Spreader brace; Wide base; Other
nb: Stabilitetsfunksjoner for spesialeffektstativ: Sklisikre føtter; Motvekt inkludert; Justerbare føtter; Låsbare ben; Gummiføtter; Sikkerhetsfeste; Sandsekkrok; Piggføtter; Spredestag; Bred base; Annet
zh-TW: 特效架穩定性功能: 防滑腳墊; 內含配重塊; 水平調整腳; 鎖定腳架; 橡膠腳墊; 安全繩掛點; 沙袋掛鉤; 腳釘; 展開支撐架; 寬底座; 其他
th: คุณสมบัติพิเศษด้านความเสถียรของขาตั้งเอฟเฟ็กต์พิเศษ: ขากันลื่น; มีน้ำหนักถ่วง; ขาปรับระดับ; ขาล็อกได้; ขายาง; จุดยึดสายนิรภัย; ตะขอแขวนถุงทราย; ขาแบบสไปค์; โครงยึดขาตั้ง; ฐานกว้าง; อื่นๆ
pl: Funkcje stabilizujące stojaka urządzenia do efektów specjalnych: Stopki antypoślizgowe; Dołączona przeciwwaga; Stopki poziomujące; Blokowane nogi; Gumowe stopki; Punkt mocowania linki zabezpieczającej; Haczyk na worek z piaskiem; Stopki z kolcami; Rozpórka; Szeroka podstawa; Inne
pt-PT: Características de estabilidade do suporte de efeitos especiais: Pés antiderrapantes; Contrapeso incluído; Pés niveladores; Pernas de bloqueio; Pés de borracha; Ponto de fixação de segurança; Gancho para saco de areia; Pés com picos; Cinta expansora; Base larga; Outro
hu: Speciális effektekhez való állvány stabilitási jellemzői: Csúszásgátló talpak; Ellensúllyal; Szintezőtalpak; Rögzíthető lábak; Gumitalpak; Biztonsági rögzítési pont; Homokzsákkampó; Tüskés talpak; Terpeszmerevítő; Széles talp; Egyéb
fr: Dispositifs de stabilité du pied pour effets spéciaux: Pieds antidérapants; Contrepoids inclus; Pieds de nivellement; Pieds verrouillables; Pieds en caoutchouc; Point d’attache de sécurité; Crochet pour sac de sable; Pieds à pointes; Entretoise; Base large; Autre
lt-LT: Specialiųjų efektų stovo stabilumo savybės: Neslystančios kojelės; Su atsvaru; Reguliuojamo aukščio kojelės; Fiksuojamos kojelės; Guminės kojelės; Apsauginio diržo tvirtinimo taškas; Smėlio maišo kabliukas; Smaigai; Tvirtinimo skėtiklis; Platus pagrindas; Kita
zh-CN: 特效支架稳定性功能: 防滑支脚; 包含配重; 调平支脚; 锁定支腿; 橡胶支脚; 安全拴固点; 沙袋挂钩; 钉鞋支脚; 延伸支架; 宽底座; 其他
fi: Erikoistehostetelineen vakausominaisuudet: Liukumattomat jalat; Sisältää vastapainon; Säätöjalat; Lukittuvat jalat; Kumijalat; Turvakiinnityspiste; Hiekkasäkin koukku; Piikkijalat; Levitintuki; Leveä jalusta; Muu
bg-BG: Функции за стабилност на стойката за специални ефекти: Неплъзгащи се крачета; Включена противотежест; Нивелиращи крачета; Заключващи се крака; Гумени крачета; Предпазна точка за закрепване; Кука за торба с пясък; Крачета с шипове; Разпорна скоба; Широка основа; Друго
cs: Stabilizační prvky stojanu pro speciální efekty: Protiskluzové nožičky; Včetně protizávaží; Vyrovnávací nožičky; Uzamykatelné nohy; Gumové nožičky; Bod pro bezpečnostní lanko; Háček na pytel s pískem; Nožičky s hroty; Rozpěra; Široká základna; Jiné
el: Χαρακτηριστικά σταθερότητας της βάσης ειδικών εφέ: Αντιολισθητικά πέλματα; Περιλαμβάνεται αντίβαρο; Πέλματα οριζοντίωσης; Πόδια με κλείδωμα; Λαστιχένια πέλματα; Σημείο πρόσδεσης ασφαλείας; Γάντζος για σάκο άμμου; Πέλματα με ακίδες; Σταυρός σταθεροποίησης; Πλατιά βάση; Άλλο
tr: Özel efekt standının denge özellikleri: Kaymaz ayak; Karşı ağırlık dahil; Dengeleme ayağı; Kilitli bacak; Kauçuk ayak; Güvenlik bağlantı noktası; Kum torbası kancası; Çivili ayak; Gergi desteği; Geniş taban; Diğer
ro-RO: Caracteristici de stabilitate pentru stative de efecte speciale: Picioare antiderapante; Contragreutate inclusă; Picioare de nivelare; Picioare de blocare; Picioare de cauciuc; Punct de ancorare de siguranță; Cârlig pentru sac de nisip; Picioare cu țepi; Bară de distanțiere; Bază lată; Altele
de: Stabilitätsmerkmale des Spezialeffekt-Stativs: Rutschfeste Füße; Inklusive Gegengewicht; Nivellierfüße; Arretierbare Beine; Gummifüße; Sicherungsseil-Befestigungspunkt; Sandsackhaken; Spike-Füße; Spreizstrebe; Breite Basis; Sonstige
nl: Special effects standaard stabiliteitskenmerken: Antislipvoetjes; Inclusief contragewicht; Stelvoeten; Vergrendelbare poten; Rubberen voetjes; Veiligheidskabelpunt; Zandzakhaak; Voetjes met spikes; Spreider; Brede basis; Overige
sk-SK: Funkcie stability stojana pre špeciálne efekty: Protišmykové nožičky; Vrátane protizávažia; Vyrovnávacie nožičky; Uzamykateľné nohy; Gumené nožičky; Bezpečnostný upevňovací bod; Hák na vrece s pieskom; Nožičky s hrotmi; Rozperná výstuha; Široká základňa; Iné
ko: 특수 효과 스탠드 안정성 기능: 미끄럼 방지 피트; 균형추 포함; 수평 조절 피트; 고정형 다리; 고무 피트; 안전 테더 지점; 모래주머니 후크; 스파이크 피트; 스프레더 브레이스; 넓은 베이스; 기타